test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-sadaaz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Numeral - sadāz: # quantifiers 163 'eng /est sajas/fin' - full paradigm
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: sadāz
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen: sadānd
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Sg+Par: sadāndt
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Sg+Dat: sadāndõn
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ins: sadāndõks
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill: sadāndõ
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela: sadāndõst
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom: sadāndõd
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen: kimdõndõd
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Pl+Par: sadāndidi
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Pl+Dat: sadāndõdõn
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ins: kimdõndõdõks
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill: sadāndiž
     sadāz+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela: sadāndist
